Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
210D]

COMMUNITY-BASED
DEVELOPMENT

Section

210D-1 Findings and purpose

210D-2 Definitions

210D-3 Hawaii community-based economic
development technical

and financial assistance program

210D-4 Hawaii community-based economic development
revolving

fund; established

210D-5 Community-based economic development
advisory council;

established

210D-6 Compensation and expenses of members

210D-7 Authority of council

210D-8 Powers and duties

210D-9 Loans; limitation and terms

210D-10 Terms of loans

210D-11 Grants; conditions and qualifications

210D-12 Priorities and preferences

210D-13 Exemption from chapters 42F and 103D

210D-14 Annual report

Note

Study on feasibility of a reentry academy for training and
entrepreneurial resources (RAFTER) for prison inmates; report to 2017
legislature. L 2016, c 227, §§3 to 5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next